Oklahoma, session 2025, SB651.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 32-118 of Title 11, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Municipal


Parking Benefit District Act”.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 32-119 of Title 11, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


As used in this act:

Req. No. 749 Page 1


1. “Governing body” shall mean the city council, city


commission, or board of trustees of an incorporated city or town;


2. “Mail” shall mean first-class mail;


3. “Municipality” shall mean any incorporated city or town; and


4. “Parking benefit district” shall mean a defined geographic


area in which a majority of the revenue generated from on-street


parking facilities within the district is used to finance


improvements within such district.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 32-120 of Title 11, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


The governing body of any municipality in this state may create


one or more parking benefit districts for the purpose of permitting


advisory committees, provided for in Section 5 of this act, to


provide recommendations to and bring issues to the attention of the


municipality regarding the maintenance of the municipality’s parking


meter program within such districts.


SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 32-121 of Title 11, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The creation of a parking benefit district shall be preceded


by notice and a public hearing. Such notice shall:





Req. No. 749 Page 2


1. Contain the time, date, and place of the meeting where the


governing body shall hold a hearing on the creation of such


district;


2. Describe the proposed boundaries of such district; and


3. State the proposed term of authorization for such district.


B. No fewer than ten (10) days nor more than thirty (30) days


before the day of the hearing, the municipal clerk or designee


shall:


1. Mail the notice of the hearing on the proposed parking


benefit district to the owners of the tracts or parcels of land to


be included in the district at each owner’s last-known address;


2. Publish the date, time, and place of the hearing in a


newspaper of general circulation in the municipality; and


3. Publish the date, time, and place of the hearing on a


website if the municipal governing body maintains a website.


Failure of an owner to receive such notice shall not invalidate


any of the proceedings authorized in this act.


C. At the hearing of the governing body on the creation of such


district, any interested resident of the municipality or business


owner or resident of the proposed parking benefit district may file


with the municipal clerk a written protest or objection questioning


the propriety and advisability of establishing the parking benefit


district.


D. At the hearing, the governing body may:

Req. No. 749 Page 3


1. Correct any mistake or irregularity in any proceeding


relating to the parking benefit district;


2. Remove any tract or parcel of land, the inclusion of which


has been protested by the owner, from such district;


3. Add any tract or parcel of land adjacent to the proposed


boundaries of such district upon request of the owner;


4. Revise the proposed term of authorization for such district;


and


5. Approve or reject the establishment of such district.


E. Approval of the establishment of a parking benefit district


shall include the effective start date of the district and describe


the term of authorization for such district, and may include any


other terms and conditions not inconsistent with the laws of this


state.


SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 32-122 of Title 11, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. For each parking benefit district established, an advisory


committee may be formed by resolution or ordinance to provide input


and make recommendations to the municipality on issues relating to


the maintenance of the parking meter program in the parking benefit


district including, but not limited to, potential projects to be


funded with revenue generated from the parking benefit district and


the timing and order of such projects. Regardless of the

Req. No. 749 Page 4


establishment of an advisory committee, all aspects of a


municipality’s parking meter program shall be under the supervision


and control of the governing body of such municipality.


B. If an advisory committee is established, it shall consist of


no fewer than three and no more than seven people serving without


compensation to be appointed jointly by a majority of the members of


the governing body of the municipality. The term of office of each


of the members of the committee shall be fixed by the governing


body; however, all members of the committee shall serve staggered


terms. Immediately after their appointment, the members of the


committee shall meet and organize by electing one of their members


as the chair, and such other officers as the committee may deem


necessary. The committee shall elect the chair and any other


officers annually. Vacancies on the committee occurring otherwise


than by expiration of term of office shall be filled by the


presiding officer of the governing body of the municipality only for


the unexpired term of the member whose vacancy is being filled. All


members of the committee shall either reside or own a business in


the area of the parking benefit district. A majority of the members


of the committee shall be business owners. Should a member of the


committee no longer reside or own a business in the parking benefit


district, that member’s position shall become vacant. No member of


the committee shall be an employee of the municipality.



Req. No. 749 Page 5


C. Notwithstanding the composition of an advisory committee,


the municipality may include as nonvoting members of the committee


such municipal officials or employees as the municipality desires.


D. An advisory committee shall meet at the call of the


committee chair, provided that the committee shall meet at least


once a year during the duration of the parking benefit district.


SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 32-123 of Title 11, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Starting on the effective date of a parking benefit


district, the governing body of a municipality may hold in a special


fund all revenue received by the municipality from the parking meter


program within such district.


B. Such funds may be used to pay the cost of any improvements


or repairs necessary for the maintenance of the parking meter


program within such district.


SECTION 7. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 32-124 of Title 11, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The governing body of any municipality may modify or


terminate any parking benefit districts within its jurisdiction,


with or without cause, by resolution or ordinance after providing


notice and a public hearing on the subject in the same manner as


required for the creation of such districts in this act.

Req. No. 749 Page 6


B. In the event a parking benefit district is terminated, any


fees and revenues generated from the use of parking meters in the


district being held for the maintenance of the parking meter program


within the district that have not been expended shall be released to


the municipality and no longer obligated to the terminated district


and any other projects recommended and approved pursuant to this


act.


SECTION 8. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 32-125 of Title 11, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


The authority granted by this act is cumulative to municipal


powers and does not limit the authority of a municipality to


maintain or manage a parking meter program.


SECTION 9. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-749 MSBB 1/19/2025 5:40:44 AM

















Req. No. 749 Page 7